New Jersey, session 221, S4410.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a.  The Department of the Treasury, on behalf of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, is authorized to sell and convey to the Town of Morristown in the County of Morris, as surplus property, all of the States right, title, and interest in the parcel of land of 0.69 ± acres, and all improvements thereon, situated on Block 801, Lot 3 of the tax map of the Town of Morristown, Morris County, located at 101 Ridgedale Avenue.  The property to be sold and conveyed has been declared surplus to the needs of the State. b.  The sale and conveyance authorized by subsection a. of this section shall be executed in accordance with the terms and conditions approved by the State House Commission. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.